Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201848-3402
Legislative findings, declarations, and intent.

(1) The Legislature finds and declares that sector partnerships are a proven strategy for engaging employers in key industries, helping workers train for and access good jobs, and coordinating education, training, and workforce development activities in response to industry needs.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature and the purpose of the Sector Partnership Program Act to support local sector partnerships that will close skill gaps in high-demand sectors of business and industry. By conducting labor availability and skills gap studies, the Sector Partnership Program will connect education and training providers with employers and will ensure that the state’s workforce and economic development activities align with the needs of employers in the state’s key industries.

Laws 2016, LB1110, § 7.